Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-52] Notice. (a) Upon receipt
of the application, the commission shall cause a notice thereof to be published
in a newspaper having general circulation within the affected area. The notice
shall be published at least once a week for two consecutive weeks. In
addition, the commission shall cause a copy of such notice to be sent to any
person who has filed a written request for notification of any pending
applications affecting a particular designated area and to the mayor and the
water board of the affected county. This notification shall be sent by regular
mail before the date of last publication. The commission shall also make
available to the public, upon request, a monthly bulletin of all pending
applications.

(b) The notice and the monthly bulletin shall
contain the name and address of the applicant; the date of filing; the date set
for a hearing, if any; the source of the water supply; the quantity of water
applied for; the use to be made of the water and any limitations thereon; the
place of the use; and the location of the well point or diversion.

(c) The notice shall state that written
objections to the proposed permit may be filed with the commission by a
specified date. The commission shall establish by rules the time limits within
which objections must be filed. The commission, at its discretion, may request
further information from either applicant or objectors, and a reasonable time
shall be allowed for such responses. Each applicant shall be notified by the
commission of the objections filed to an application. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next